Rhode Island, session 2025, SB893.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-3 of the General Laws entitled "Property Subject to Taxation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-3-9.8.1. Exemption or stabilization of tax on qualified property used for residential
purposes in the town of West Greenwich.
(a) Except as provided in this section, in order to address the longstanding challenges faced
by the town of West Greenwich to meet state and local needs for low- and moderate-income
housing pursuant to the provisions of chapter 53 of title 45 and the town of West Greenwich code
of ordinances, the town council of the town of West Greenwich may vote to authorize, subject to
the conditions in this section, to exempt from payment, in whole or in part, real qualified property,
or to determine a stabilized amount, notwithstanding the valuation of the property or the rate of tax;
provided that, after a public hearing, ten (10) days' notice of which shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the town, and upon a determination by the town council that
the granting of the exemption and/or stabilization of taxes for a qualified property shall inure to the
benefit of the town of West Greenwich including, without limitation, by reason of the town of West
Greenwich achieving, exceeding, or furthering its realization of its goal of ten percent (10%) of its
year round housing units constituting low- and moderate-income housing units pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 53 of title 45.
(b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying property" means property for which there is
an approved comprehensive permit project pursuant to chapter 53 of title 45, in which final plan

approval has been recorded. Qualified property may be comprised of one or more contiguous lots
and may have multiple owners. Nothing in this section shall prevent the town from approving any
exemption or agreement under this section prior to final plan approval and recording, as long as the
period in which the taxes are exempt and/or stabilized does not begin until the final plan is recorded.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the town council may vote to
authorize an agreement under this section for a period of up to thirty (30) years.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property for which taxes have been
exempted and/or stabilized, in whole or in part, pursuant to this section shall not, during the period
for which taxes have been so exempted and/or stabilized, be further liable to taxation by the town
as long as such property shall remain qualified property as defined in this section.
(e) Notwithstanding this section, owners of qualifying low-income housing in the town of
West Greenwich under §44-5-13.11 shall be entitled to the tax treatment provided under such
section and may, but need not, seek or obtain tax exemption and/or stabilization under this section.
With respect to all qualifying low-income housing in the town of West Greenwich under the
provisions of §44-5-13.11, the town council's grant of exemption and/or stabilization under this
section shall result in taxation of such qualifying low-income housing that is no less favorable than
the taxation otherwise provided under §44-5-13.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002608
========
LC002608 - Page 2 of 3